Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-8,202
License; probation,
revocation, or suspension; appeal.

The board may by a four-fifths vote of the entire board place a licensed
professional landscape architect on probation or revoke or suspend the license of
any professional landscape architect licensed under the Professional
Landscape Architects Act whom it finds guilty of (1) deceit in obtaining a license, (2) fraud, (3) gross negligence, (4)
incompetency, or (5) misconduct in the practice of professional landscape
architecture. Such person shall have the right to appeal the revocation or
suspension of his or her license, and
the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 19, p. 1865;

Laws 1971, LB 98, § 5;

Laws 1984, LB 477, § 11;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 171;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 20.
July 19, 2012
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.